Indiana, session 2026, HB1270.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-12-1-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 76, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) During the interval between sessions of the
general assembly, the budget agency shall make regular or, at the
request of the governor, special inspections of the respective
institutions of the state supported by public funds. The budget agency
shall report regularly to the governor relative to the physical condition
of such institutions, and any contemplated action of the institution on
a new or important matter, and on any other subject which the budget
agency may deem pertinent or on which the governor may require
information. The budget agency shall likewise familiarize itself with
the best and approved practices in each of such institutions and supply
such information to other institutions to make their operation more
efficient and economical.
(b) Except as to officers and employees of state educational
institutions, the executive secretary of the governor, the administrative
assistants to the governor, the elected officials, and persons whose
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


salaries or compensation are fixed by the governor pursuant to law, the
annual compensation of all persons employed by agencies of the state
shall be subject to the approval of the budget agency. Except as
otherwise provided by IC 4-15-2.2, the budget agency shall establish
classifications and schedules for fixing compensation, salaries, and
wages of all classes and types of employees of any state agency or state
agencies, and any and all other such classifications affecting
compensation as the budget agency shall deem necessary or desirable.
The classifications and schedules thus established shall be filed in the
office of the budget agency.
(c) This subsection does not apply to the department of child
services. Requests by an appointing authority for salary and wage
adjustments or personal service payments coming within such the
classifications and schedules established under subsection (b) shall
become effective when approved by, and upon the terms of approval
fixed by, the budget agency. All personnel requests pertaining to the
staffing of programs or agencies supported in whole or in part by
federal funds are subject to review and approval by the state personnel
department under IC 4-15-2.2.
(c) (d) The budget agency shall review and approve, for the
sufficiency of funds, all payments for personal services which are
submitted to the state comptroller for payment.
(d) (e) The budget agency shall review all contracts for personal
services or other services and no contract for personal services or other
services may be entered into by any agency of the state before the
written approval of the budget agency is given. Each demand for
payment submitted by an agency to the state comptroller under these
contracts must be accompanied by a copy of the budget agency
approval. No payment may be made by the state comptroller without
such approval. However, this subsection does not apply to a contract
entered into by:
(1) a state educational institution; or
(2) an agency of the state if the contract is not required to be
approved by the budget agency under IC 4-13-2-14.1.
(e) (f) The budget agency shall review and approve the policy and
procedures governing travel prepared by the department of
administration under IC 4-13-1, before the travel policies and
procedures are distributed.
(f) (g) Except as provided in subsections (g), (h), and (i), (h), (i),
and (j), the budget agency may adopt such policies and procedures not
inconsistent with law as it may deem advisable to facilitate and carry
out the powers and duties of the agency, including the execution and
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


administration of all appropriations made by law. IC 4-22-2 does not
apply to these policies and procedures.
(g) (h) The budget agency may not enforce or apply any policy or
procedure, unless specifically authorized by this chapter or an
applicable statute, against or in relation to the following officials or
agencies, unless the official or agency consents to comply with the
policy or procedure, or emergency circumstances justify extraordinary
measures to protect the state's budget or fiscal reserves:
(1) The judicial department of the state.
(2) The general assembly, the legislative services agency, or any
other entity of the legislative department of the state.
(3) The attorney general.
(4) The state comptroller.
(5) The secretary of state.
(6) The treasurer of state.
(h) (i) The budget agency may not enforce a policy or procedure
against an official or an agency specified in subsection (g)(1) (h)(1)
through (g)(6) (h)(6) by refusing to allot money from the state agency
contingency fund to the official or agency without review by the budget
committee.
(i) (j) The budget agency may not withhold or refuse to allot
appropriations for a state educational institution without review by the
budget committee.
(k) Salary and wage adjustments or personal service payments
coming within the classifications and schedules established by the
budget agency under subsection (b) for the department of child
services shall become effective when approved by the appointing
authority of the department of child services.
SECTION 2. IC 4-15-2.2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. The director shall do the following:
(1) Direct and supervise all administrative and technical activities
of the department.
(2) Survey the administrative organization and procedures,
including personnel procedures, of all state agencies, and submit
to the governor measures to do the following among state
agencies:
(A) Secure greater efficiency and economy.
(B) Minimize the duplication of activities.
(C) Effect better organization and procedures.
(3) Develop personnel policies, methods, procedures, and
standards for all state agencies.
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


(4) Establish and maintain a roster of all employees in the state
civil service.
(5) Prepare, or cause to be prepared, a classification and pay plan
for the state civil service. The director shall annually review
the:
(A) classification plan for the state civil service for
department of child services employees with the director
of the department of child services to ensure employees are
properly classified; and
(B) pay plan for the state civil service for department of
child services employees with the director of the
department of child services.
(6) Administer the classification and pay plan prepared under
subdivision (5).
(7) In the case of:
(A) the department of child services, facilitate the
allocation of each position in the state civil service with the
department of child services to its proper class, as
determined by the director of the department of child
services or the designee of the director of the department
of child services; and
(B) a state agency not described in clause (A), allocate each
position in the state civil service to its proper class.
(8) In the case of:
(A) the department of child services, facilitate the
onboarding of individuals for appointment to positions in
the state civil service with the department of child services,
at the request of the director of the department of child
services or the designee of the director of the department
of child services; and
(B) a state agency not described in clause (A), approve
individuals for appointment to positions in the state civil
service.
(9) In the case of:
(A) the department of child services, facilitate the transfer,
demotion, or promotion of employees within the state civil
service in positions with the department of child services at
the request of the director of the department of child
services or the designee of the director of the department
of child services; and
(B) a state agency not described in clause (A), approve
employees for transfer, demotion, or promotion within the
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


state civil service.
(10) In the case of:
(A) the department of child services, facilitate the
suspension, layoff, or dismissal of employees within the
state civil service in positions with the department of child
services at the request of the director of the department of
child services or the designee of the director of the
department of child services; and
(B) a state agency not described in clause (A), approve
employees for suspension, layoff, or dismissal from the state
civil service.
(11) In the case of:
(A) the department of child services, facilitate the process
of rating the service of department of child services
employees, to be carried out by the department of child
services; and
(B) a state agency not described in clause (A), rate the
service of employees.
(12) Arrange, in cooperation with the directors of the divisions of
the service, for employee training.
(13) Make available employee relations specialists to help
employees:
(A) resolve employment related problems; and
(B) understand the procedures that are available for redress of
grievances that the employee relations specialists do not
resolve; and
(14) (C) investigate systems of appointment and promotion in
operation in various departments or divisions of the state
government.
(15) (14) This subdivision does not apply to positions in the
state civil service with the department of child services.
Investigate and approve the need for existing and new positions
in the state civil service.
(16) (15) Investigate periodically the operation and effectiveness
of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.
(17) (16) Implement, administer, and enforce this chapter and
rules and policies adopted under this chapter.
(18) (17) Appoint employees, experts, and special assistants, as
necessary, to effectively carry out this chapter.
(19) (18) Perform any other lawful acts that the director considers
necessary or desirable to carry out this chapter.
(20) (19) Perform any other duties imposed by this chapter or
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


assigned by the governor.
(21) (20) Provide offices, rooms, and staff assistance to the office
of administrative law proceedings established by IC 4-15-10.5-7.
SECTION 3. IC 4-15-2.2-24, AS ADDED BY P.L.229-2011,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) An employee in the unclassified service is
an employee at will and serves at the pleasure of the employee's
appointing authority.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), an employee in the
unclassified service may be dismissed, demoted, disciplined, or
transferred for any reason that does not contravene public policy.
(c) This subsection applies only to the department of child
services. An employee in the unclassified service in a position with
the department of child services may be dismissed, demoted,
disciplined, or transferred by the director of the department of
child services or by the designee of the director of the department
of child services for any reason that does not contravene public
policy.
SECTION 4. IC 4-15-2.2-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.182-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) This subsection does not apply for
purposes of positions in the state civil service with the department
of child services. The director, after consulting with appointing
authorities and other qualified authorities, shall determine, or cause to
be determined, the authority, duties, and responsibilities of all positions
in the state civil service.
(b) The director shall prepare a classification plan that groups all
positions in the state civil service in classes, based on the authority,
duties, and responsibilities of each position. However, positions with
the department of child services shall be grouped in the
classification plan as determined by the director of the department
of child services. The classification plan must set forth, for each class
of positions, the class title and a statement of the authority, duties, and
responsibilities of the class. Each class of positions may be subdivided,
and classes may be grouped and ranked in such manner as the director
considers appropriate.
(c) The director periodically shall:
(1) review the positions in state civil service; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (e), reallocate the positions
to the proper classes based on the duties and responsibilities of
the positions at the time of the review under subdivision (1).
(d) Upon request by the budget director under IC 4-13-2-18(k), the
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


director shall:
(1) review permanent full-time positions which have been vacant
for, in the case of the department of child services, one
hundred twenty (120) days, and, in the case of any other state
agency, ninety (90) days; and
(2) either:
(A) reallocate a vacant position to the proper class based on
the duties and responsibilities of the position at the time of the
review under subdivision (1); or
(B) eliminate the position from state civil service.
(e) The director may carry out the reallocation of positions with
the department of child services under subsection (c)(2) only after
receiving a final proposal for the reallocation of positions from the
director of the department of child services.
SECTION 5. IC 4-15-2.2-30, AS ADDED BY P.L.229-2011,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 30. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), an
application for employment may be rejected if the department
determines that the applicant:
(1) lacks any of the required qualifications;
(2) is incapable of performing the essential functions of the
position that the applicant is seeking;
(3) (1) has been convicted of a crime;
(4) (2) has been dismissed from the public service;
(5) (3) has made a false statement of a material fact; or
(6) (4) committed or attempted to commit a fraud or deception in
connection with submitting an application or attempting to secure
an appointment to the state civil service.
(b) An appointing authority may waive application of this
section in writing if the written waiver is signed by the appointing
authority and submitted to the department.
SECTION 6. IC 4-15-2.2-36, AS ADDED BY P.L.229-2011,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 36. (a) In cooperation with appointing authorities,
the director shall establish, and may periodically amend:
(1) the standards of performance for employees;
(2) in the case of employees of any state agency except for the
department of child services, the expected outcomes for
employees; and
(3) a system of service ratings based upon the standards described
in subdivisions (1) and (2).
(b) Employee performance standards and expected outcomes must
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


be specific, measurable, achievable, relevant to the strategic objective
of the employee's state agency or state institution, and time sensitive.
Performance standards and expected outcomes must be approved
by an agency's appointing authority.
(c) Each employee at all levels of the state civil service shall be held
accountable for participating in the process of establishing the
standards, outcomes, and ratings described in this section.
(d) Each appointing authority shall, at periodic intervals (but at least
annually), make, and report to the director, service ratings for the
employees in the appointing authority's division of the service. As
requested by the director, the appointing authority shall provide the
information on which the appointing authority relied in determining a
service rating.
(e) Service ratings may be used as follows:
(1) To determine salary increases and decreases within the limits
established by law and by the pay plan developed under section
27 of this chapter.
(2) As a factor in making promotions.
(3) As a means of discovering employees:
(A) who are candidates for promotion or transfer; or
(B) who, because of a low service rating, are candidates for
demotion or dismissal.
SECTION 7. IC 4-15-2.2-40, AS ADDED BY P.L.229-2011,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40. (a) An The appointing authority of each state
agency has the authority to lay off or furlough employees or to reduce
hours of employment for any of the following reasons:
(1) Lack of funds.
(2) A reduction in spending authorization.
(3) Lack of work.
(4) Efficiency.
(b) The appointing authority of each state agency has the authority
to determine the extent, effective dates, and length of a layoff, furlough,
or reduction in hours taken under subsection (a).
(c) The appointing authority shall determine the classifications
affected and the number of employees laid off in each classification
and county to which a layoff applies.
(d) (c) In determining a layoff, the appointing authority must
consider all employees under the same appointing authority, within the
classification affected, and within the county affected, and consider
service ratings first. Thereafter, consideration may be given to may
consider, in no particular order, the following relevant factors:
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125


(1) Disciplinary record.
(2) Knowledge, skill, and ability.
(3) Seniority.
(4) Service ratings.
SECTION 8. IC 4-15-2.2-41, AS ADDED BY P.L.229-2011,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 41. (a) This section does not apply to a former
employee of the department of child services.
(b) As used in this section, "state seniority" means the length of an
employee's unbroken, continuous state employment.
(b) (c) A former employee in the state civil service system has a
right of recall to the classification from which the employee was laid
off. Recall rights under this section are to positions under the same
appointing authority and in the same or a contiguous county from
which a former employee was laid off.
(c) (d) A former employee must assert in a timely manner the claim
of entitlement to recall in response to the official posting of a vacancy.
(d) (e) A recall under this section is contingent upon the former
employee having the knowledge, skill, and ability to perform the duties
of the position for which the former employee is applying.
(e) (f) The appointing authority shall recall former employees in the
order of the employees' service ratings. In the event of a tie in service
ratings, the right to recall is determined by state seniority. If there is a
tie in state seniority, the former employee with the highest number
comprised of the last four (4) digits of the employee's Social Security
number is the employee recalled.
(f) (g) The right to recall under this section expires on the earlier of:
(1) one (1) year after date the employee is laid off; or
(2) the date the employee is reemployed in a permanent position.
(g) (h) For state seniority purposes, an employee who becomes
reemployed within one (1) year after the date the employee is laid off
is considered to have unbroken, continuous state employment, except
that the time that the employee spent in out-of-pay status as a result of
the layoff must be deducted from the employee's total seniority.
SECTION 9. IC 31-25-2-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 2. The director may employ necessary personnel to carry
out the department's responsibilities subject to:
(1) the budget agency's approval under IC 4-12-1-13; and
(2) IC 4-15-2.2.
2026 IN 1270—LS 6999/DI 125